District of Columbia statutes.
10-301

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1)

The term “adopt” means to enter into a binding commitment to a program, site, or operation for not less than 1 year in duration.

(2)

“Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(3)

“Department activity” means an activity, event, class, program, operation, service, or product for the benefit, enjoyment, education, amusement, or convenience of the public.

(4)

“Designated Organizations” means entities designated by the Director pursuant to § 10-137.01.

(5)

“Fee-based use permit” means a permit issued by the Department to a person for a fee-based Department activity.

(6)

“Friends Groups” means an organization, qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, approved October 22, 1986 (100 Stat. 2085; 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), and registered under the park partner program, whose mission includes supporting an adopted park or recreation facility by advocating, fundraising, maintaining, and assisting in the planning process for the park or recreation facility adopted.

(7)

“Park Partner Agreement” means the agreement between the Department and the Friends Group explaining the duties, rights, and obligations of the Friends Group.

(8)

“Planned Unit Development” means a plan for the development of residential, institutional, and commercial developments, industrial parks, urban renewal projects, or a combination of these as defined in the Zoning Regulations of the District of Columbia (11 DCMR § 199).

(9)

The term “sponsor” means to pledge or promise support to a program, site, or operation on an intermittent, short-term or one-time basis.

History

Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 2, 42 DCR 452
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 6042(a), 58 DCR 6226
Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-275, § 2(a), 60 DCR 2058
Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-280, § 2(a), 60 DCR 2124

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-301.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-21 added pars. (1A) to (1D).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-275 substituted “whose mission includes supporting” for “whose primary mission is to support” in (6).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-280 added (2) and (3) and redesignated former (1A) as (4); added present (5); and redesignated former (1B) through (2) as (6) through (9), respectively.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see §§ 2-7 of the Recreation Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-20, February 28, 1995, 42 DCR 1175).

Short Title

Short title: Section 6041 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle E of title VI of the act may be cited as “Department of Parks and Recreation Revenue Generation Amendment Act of 2011”.